Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1390.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 641. School Mapping Services.--(a) A contract funded in whole or in part with money appropriated by the Commonwealth and entered into between a school district and a vendor for school mapping services shall comply with the following requirements:(1) Maps must be in formats that integrate with and are viewable within software platforms used in Federal, State and municipal public safety agencies that provide emergency services 12345678910111213141516171819 to the school district without requiring the purchase of additional software or payment of fees to access the data. Vendors of school mapping services must provide the maps to authorized law enforcement and emergency responders at no cost.(2) Maps must be in formats capable of being printed, shared electronically and, if requested, digitally integrated into interactive mobile platforms in use.(3) Maps must be viewable and printable from open-source documents or image viewers.(4) Maps must be oriented to true north and include a fixed grid with consistent "x" and "y" coordinates.(5) Maps must have been produced from data verified for accuracy through an onsite walk-through of the school buildings and grounds depicted on the maps by the entity producing the data.(6) Maps must include accurate floor plans overlaid on current, verified aerial imagery of the school campus.(7) Maps must include site-specific labeling for school structures such as room names, hallway designations, exterior doors, stairwell numbers and the locations of hazards, critical utility controls, key boxes, automated external defibrillators and trauma kits and school grounds, including parking areas, athletic fields, surrounding roads and neighboring properties.(8) Maps must be created, stored and maintained exclusively within the United States for the entire duration of the mapping process and duration of the term of the contract to ensure security of the data.(b) A school district shall consult and receive written approval from the primary law enforcement agency serving and supporting the school district prior to entering into a contract 20260SB1390PN1826 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for school mapping services to ensure that the data used under the contract complies with this section.(c) For purposes of this section, the term "school mapping services" means services that create detailed maps of school campuses to improve emergency response and coordination and which maps are created in file formats that integrate into the software systems in use by public safety agencies to ensure use by public safety agencies to locate room numbers, exits and utility areas for emergency response.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1390PN1826 - 3 - 12345678910